District of Columbia statutes.
8-1536

Evaluation of food service ware litter in the Anacostia River.

By January 1, 2016, the Mayor shall conduct a study evaluating the amount and types of trash found in the Anacostia River, including polystyrene foam, and submit findings to the Council.

Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 406, 61 DCR 8045

History

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(f) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that §§ 401, 402, and 406 of the act shall apply as of December 17, 2014.

Editor's Notes